District of Columbia statutes.
26-131.11

Record keeping requirements.

An operator of an automated teller machine in the District shall maintain and, upon request, make available to the Commissioner, in a form satisfactory to the Commissioner, such books, records, and accounts as will enable the Commissioner to verify the daily activity at each of the operator’s automated teller machines. An operator shall retain the books, records, and accounts referred to in the previous sentence for at least 90 days from the date of the daily activity.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 511, 48 DCR 3244

History